Maryland, session 2025, SB0714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–306.
(a) (1) In this section, “restorative [approaches”] PRACTICES” means a
COMMUNALLY AND CULTURALLY RESPONSIVE, relationship–focused student discipline
model that:
(i) Is preventive and proactive;
(ii) Emphasizes building strong relationships and setting clear
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0714*

SENATE BILL 714
behavioral expectations that contribute to the well–being of the school community;
(iii) In response to behavior that violates the clear behavioral
expectations that contribute to the well–being of the school community, focuses on
accountability for any harm done by the problem behavior; and
(iv) Addresses ways to repair the relationships affected by the
problem behavior with the voluntary participation of an individual who was harmed.
(2) “Restorative [approaches”] PRACTICES” may include:
(i) Conflict resolution;
(ii) Mediation;
(iii) Peer mediation;
(iv) Circle processes;
(v) Restorative conferences;
(vi) Social emotional learning;
(vii) Trauma–informed care;
(viii) Positive behavioral intervention supports; and
(ix) [Rehabilitation] PERSONAL ACCOUNTABILITY.
(b) Notwithstanding any bylaw, rule, or regulation made or approved by the State
Board, a principal, vice principal, or other employee may not administer corporal
punishment to discipline a student in a public school in the State.
(c) The State Board shall:
(1) Establish guidelines that define a State code of discipline for all public
schools with standards of conduct and consequences for violations of the standards;
(2) On request, provide technical assistance and training to county boards
regarding the use of restorative [approaches] PRACTICES; and
(3) Assist each county board with the implementation of the guidelines.
(d) (1) Subject to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section, each
county board shall adopt regulations designed to create and maintain within the schools
under its jurisdiction the atmosphere of order and discipline necessary for effective
learning.

SENATE BILL 714 3
(2) The regulations adopted by a county board under this subsection:
(i) Shall provide for educational and behavioral interventions,
restorative [approaches] PRACTICES, counseling, and student and parent conferencing;
(ii) Shall provide alternative programs, which may include in–school
suspension, suspension, expulsion, or other disciplinary measures that are deemed
appropriate; and
(iii) Shall state that the primary purpose of any disciplinary measure
is rehabilitative, restorative, and educational.
(e) (1) On or before October 1 each year, the Department shall submit to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly, a student discipline data report that includes a description of the uses of
restorative [approaches] PRACTICES in the State and a review of disciplinary practices
and policies in the State.
(2) The Department shall disaggregate the information in any student
discipline data report prepared by the Department by race, ethnicity, gender, disability
status, eligibility for free or reduced price meals or an equivalent measure of socioeconomic
status, English language proficiency, and type of discipline for:
(i) The State;
(ii) Each local school system; and
(iii) Each public school.
(3) Special education–related data in any report prepared under this
subsection shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE PUBLIC IN AN ACCESSIBLE AND
DISAGGREGATED ELECTRONIC SPREADSHEET FORMAT ALL DISCIPLINE–RELATED
DATA AS A DATA DOWNLOAD ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE AT THE STATE LEVEL,
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM LEVEL, AND SCHOOL LEVEL.
(2) FOR ALL DATA MADE PUBLIC UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE
DATA, DISAGGREGATED BY GRADE LEVEL, RACE, ETHNICITY, DISABILITY STATUS,
INCLUDING WHETHER A STUDENT HAS A 504 PLAN OR INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION
PROGRAM, SOCIOECONOMIC STATUS, ENGLISH LANGUAGE PROFICIENCY, AND
GENDER, RELATED TO ANY DISPROPORTIONAL DISCIPLINARY PRACTICES OF:
(I) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM; OR

SENATE BILL 714
(II) A PUBLIC SCHOOL.
(3) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT ON THE DATA GATHERED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(G) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “HIGH–SUSPENDING” INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING SCHOOLS
THAT SUSPEND STUDENTS IN EACH SUBGROUP DISAGGREGATED BY RACE,
ETHNICITY, DISABILITY STATUS, INCLUDING SEPARATELY STUDENTS WITH A 504
PLAN OR INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM, AND ENGLISH LANGUAGE
PROFICIENCY:
1. AN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL THAT SUSPENDS 10% OR
MORE OF ITS STUDENTS IN EACH SUBGROUP; AND
2. A SECONDARY SCHOOL THAT SUSPENDS 25% OR
MORE OF ITS STUDENTS IN EACH SUBGROUP.
(III) “RISK RATIO” MEANS THE RATIO OF STUDENTS IN A
SUBGROUP THAT ARE REMOVED FROM A SCHOOL TO ALL OTHER STUDENTS
ENROLLED AT THE SAME SCHOOL.
(IV) “STATE COMPARISON THRESHOLD” MEANS A RATIO OF THE
REMOVAL RATE OF STUDENTS IN A SUBGROUP TO THE REMOVAL RATE:
1. OF ALL STUDENTS ENROLLED IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN
THE STATE; OR
2. ACROSS LIKE SCHOOL LEVELS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN A RISK RATIO AND STATE
COMPARISON THRESHOLD OF 2.0 TO IDENTIFY A SCHOOL’S DISCIPLINE PROCESS AS
HAVING A DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT ON STUDENTS WITH MINORITY STATUS,
DISABILITY STATUS, OR ENGLISH LANGUAGE PROFICIENCY STATUS.
(3) IF THE DEPARTMENT IDENTIFIES A SCHOOL AS BEING
HIGH–SUSPENDING OR HAVING A DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT, THE LOCAL
EDUCATION AGENCY SHALL PREPARE AND SUBMIT A PLAN TO THE STATE BOARD
TO:

SENATE BILL 714 5
(I) REDUCE THE DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT WITHIN 1 YEAR
AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE SCHOOL IS IDENTIFIED; AND
(II) ELIMINATE THE DISPROPORTIONATE IMPACT WITHIN 3
YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE SCHOOL IS IDENTIFIED.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, ON
OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE THE DATA GATHERED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO REPORT THE
DATA COLLECTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH ON ANY
SUBGROUP WITH A POPULATION FEWER THAN 10 INDIVIDUALS IF DOING SO WOULD
VIOLATE THE STUDENT EDUCATION RECORDS PRIVACY PROVISIONS OF THE
FEDERAL FAMILY EDUCATIONAL RIGHTS AND PRIVACY ACT.
(5) (I) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH AN ACTION PLAN
RELATING TO THE DEPARTMENT’S ANNUAL REPORTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE ACTION PLAN SHALL:
1. SUMMARIZE:
A. THE DISPROPORTIONALITY DATA FOR ANY SCHOOL
IDENTIFIED USING THE RISK RATIO AND STATE COMPARISON THRESHOLD; AND
B. THE LEVELS OF SUSPENSION IDENTIFIED USING THE
“HIGH–SUSPENDING” MEASURE; AND
2. BE DESIGNED TO:
A. PROVIDE LOCAL EDUCATION AGENCIES WITH
SUPPORT AND RESOURCES TO REDUCE DISPARITIES IN DISCIPLINE TO BELOW THE
2.0 RISK RATIO AND STATE COMPARISON THRESHOLD OR REDUCE EXCLUSIONARY
DISCIPLINE OVERALL TO BELOW THE HIGH–SUSPENDING THRESHOLD; AND
B. COMPLEMENT THE PLANS DEVELOPED BY THE LOCAL
EDUCATION AGENCY IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(f)] (H) (1) In this subsection, “alternative school discipline practice” means

SENATE BILL 714
a discipline practice used in a public school that is not an in–school suspension or an
out–of–school suspension.
(2) The Department shall collect data on alternative school discipline
practices in public schools for each local school system, including:
(i) The types of alternative school discipline practices that are used
in a local school system; and
(ii) The type of misconduct for which an alternative discipline
practice is used.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.